District of Columbia statutes.
38-275.01

Rules.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 30-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, by resolution, within this 30-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

(b)

All rules and regulations, issued under appropriate authority, prior to July 18, 2008, shall continue in full force and effect until superseded by the rules issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

History

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-202, § 501, 55 DCR 6297